Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1329
Tax maps; county assessor; maintain.

The Property Tax Administrator shall require each county assessor to maintain tax maps in accordance with standards specified by the Property Tax Administrator. Whenever necessary to correct mapping deficiencies, the Property Tax Administrator shall install standard maps or approve mapping plans and supervise map production. The Property Tax Administrator may require the county to reimburse the state for tax maps installed.

Laws 1969, c. 622, § 5, p. 2514;

Laws 1995, LB 490, § 125.